Wisconsin, session 2025, SB955.
do enact as follows:SB955,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB955,2,24(1) Internet crimes against children law enforcement. In the schedule 5under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 620.455 (2) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $400,000 for 7Internet crimes against children law enforcement. In the schedule under s. 20.005 8(3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (2) (a), the 1dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $400,000 for Internet crimes 2against children law enforcement.SB955,2,33